Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB579.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1317-C. School armed guards. (a) Guards and designation.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, each school entity that has met the tier 1 baseline criteria for physical security established by the committee shall:(1) Assign at least one school armed guard to each school building.(2) Designate a point or points of entry and exit in 12345678910111213141516171819 each school building through which each individual must enter and exit, except in the event of a fire drill, school security drill or emergency evacuation. (3) Equip each exterior door of a school building that has not been designated a point of entry and exit with: (i) a clearly marked sign designating the door as an emergency exit only; and(ii) an audible alarm that sounds when the door is opened.(b) Assignment.--A school armed guard assigned to a school building shall be present at all times in the school building during the school day and extracurricular activities that occur outside the school day in the school building.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School armed guard." An individual who:(1) Is employed by a school entity or third-party vendor.(2) Maintains a current and valid certification in the use and handling of a firearm issued under any of the following:(i) The act of October 10, 1974 (P.L.705, No.235), known as the Lethal Weapons Training Act.(ii) The act of December 13, 2005 (P.L.432, No.79), known as the Retired Law Enforcement Identification Act.(iii) 44 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 Subch. C (relating to sheriff and deputy sheriff education and training).(iv) 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).20250HB0579PN0581 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "School building." A building owned by or under the control of a school entity where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity." The following:(1) A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.(2) An approved private school that is participating in the School Safety and Security Grant Program."Third-party vendor." A company or entity approved by the department through the Office for Safe Schools or the commission under section 1315-C(2) that provides school security services.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0579PN0581 - 3 - 12345678910111213